Hawaii, session 2025, SB927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  Chapter 261E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§261E-    Emergency charter air services.  (a)  The commission shall enter into a contract with a qualified charter air service provider to ensure the availability of emergency air transportation in cases of emergency when no other air transportation service is available. (b)  The contract shall require the qualified charter air service provider to: (1)  Provide services within twenty-four hours of receiving notice from the commission; (2)  Provide a minimum of five flights per month for emergency purposes; and (3)  Maintain all certifications, licenses, and insurance required by state and federal law. (c)  Any department or agency of the State may utilize the qualified charter air service provider for emergency air transportation.  Any department or agency utilizing the charter air service provider shall reimburse the commission for the cost of the flight services, as determined by the terms of the contract. (d)  The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including but not limited to the procedures for requesting and reimbursing the costs of charter air services." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the air carrier commission to enter into a contract with a qualified charter air service provider to provide emergency air transportation in accordance with section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. part ii Section 3.  (a)  There is established an air noise and safety task force within the department of transportation for administrative purposes. (b)  The air noise and safety task force shall: (1)  Collect and review public complaints regarding aircraft noise and safety; (2)  Identify key aircraft noise and safety issues affecting the State; (3)  Make recommendations that address aircraft noise and safety issues related to the Federal Aviation Administration National Transportation Safety Board and other appropriate federal agencies; (4)  Make recommendations that address business practices and aircraft operators falling within state and local jurisdiction; and (5)  Make recommendations that address aircraft noise and safety issues of aircraft operators. (c)  The members of the task force shall include: (1)  A member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, who shall serve as a co-chair of the task force; (2)  A member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who shall serve as a co-chair of the task force; (3)  The director of transportation, or the director's designee; and (4)  The director of the office of planning and sustainable development, or the director's designee. (d)  The co-chairs of the task force shall invite the following persons to join the task force: (1)  A representative from the Federal Aviation Administration; (2)  A representative from the National Transportation Safety Board; (3)  Not less than one representative from the helicopter industry; (4)  Not less than one representative from the small aircraft agency; and (5)  Representatives from communities impacted by aircraft noise or having safety concerns. (e)  The members of the task force shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (f)  The task force shall submit a preliminary report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than December 1, of each year. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the air noise and safety task force. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. PART III SECTION 5.  (a)  There is established an airports advisory council to be placed within the department of transportation for administrative purposes only. (b)  The airports advisory council shall: (1)  Provide an ongoing forum for coordinating relevant stakeholders and issues as they relate to airports, air transportation, and any other issues as may be appropriate; and (2)  Develop plans and contingencies which may be updated as necessary, for each airport that provides for a coordinated response between airport stakeholders and others as may be relevant in the surrounding community to best accommodate travelers and employees in the event of significant disruptions, emergencies, and unexpected events. (c)  The council shall be chaired by the deputy director of the airports division of the department of transportation, or the deputy director's designee, and shall be composed of airport and airline transportation stakeholders including but not limited to representatives invited by the chair of relevant: (1)  Airlines; (2)  Labor Unions; (3)  Concessions; (4)  Hospitality; (5)  Airport Security; (6)  Law enforcement; (7)  Chairs of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over air transportation; and (8)  Any other stakeholders the chair deems to be relevant. SECTION 6.  (a)  The department of transportation may, through the adoption of administrative rules, designate an airport security area within an airport property. (b)  A designated airport security area shall be identified by posted and visible signage at reasonable intervals, that shall include any rules specific to the airport security area. (c)  Within a designated airport security area, the department of transportation may: (1)  Restrict or limit public access, including by date or time; (2)  Restrict or limit the maintaining, placing, or leaving of personal property in a public right of way; (3)  Restrict or limit standing, sitting, or laying in a public right of way; and (4)  Restrict or limit public access by an individual to not more than a specified duration of time. SECTION 7.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the airports advisory council. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. PART IV SECTION 8.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment within the airports division of the department of transportation of: (1)  One full-time (1.0 FTE) chief airports planner position; (2)  One full-time (1.0 FTE) chief airports architect position; (3)  One full-time (1.0 FTE) chief landscape architect position; (4)  One full-time (1.0 FTE) planning expert position, with history and expertise in placemaking, resort and thematic experiences; and (5)  One full-time (1.0 FTE) branding and marketing expert position. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. PART V SECTION 9.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 10.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.